Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 43 Cabinet-Level Departments of the Executive Branch
25-43-502. State entities transferred to Department of Education.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Education by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Arkansas Better Chance Program, created under § 6-45-105;

The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, created under § 6-61-201;

The Arkansas School for the Blind, described in § 6-43-201 et seq.;

The Arkansas School for the Deaf, created under § 6-43-301;

The Arkansas State Library, created under § 13-2-203;

The Board of Trustees for the Arkansas School for the Blind and Arkansas School for the Deaf, created under § 6-43-101;

The Department of Career Education, created under § 25-30-106, now to be known as the “Division of Career and Technical Education”;

The Department of Education, created under § 25-6-102, now to be known as the “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education”;

The Department of Higher Education, created under § 25-7-101, now to be known as the “Division of Higher Education”;

The Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation, created under § 6-21-112;

The Division of Public School Accountability, created under § 6-15-102;

The Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission, created under § 25-24-101;

The State Board of Education, created under § 6-11-101;

The State Library Board, created under § 13-2-205; and

The AmeriCorps Office, created under § 25-43-504.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Education under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Education under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Education under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Education in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 89, § 51, provided: “LOAN.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Arkansas Code Annotated §19-5-501(b)(1)(C)(ii) and (D)(i), immediately upon the effective date of this act, the director of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is authorized to request the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to make a loan on his or her books in the amount not to exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund. Loan repayments shall be made from time to time from any legal fund of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality and the entire amount of the loan shall be repaid to the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund by June 30, 2023.

“By October 15, January 15, April 15, and July 15 of each fiscal year the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality shall report to Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee the status of hazardous waste cleanup efforts at the Trafalgar Road site in Bella Vista, Arkansas. The report shall include:

“(a)all funds expended by each quarter of the fiscal year

“(b)source of funds expended

“(c)estimated total of funds to be expended

“(d)expected date for completion of cleanup

“(e)all efforts of cost recovery from responsible parties”.

Acts 2020, No. 89, § 52, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Energy and Environment.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
1030.

25-43-503. Secretary of the Department of Education.

The executive head of the Department of Education shall be the Secretary of the Department of Education.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
1030.

25-43-504. AmeriCorps Office.

There is created within the Division of Higher Education of the Department of Education an AmeriCorps Office.

The AmeriCorps Office shall perform those duties as delegated by the Secretary of the Department of Education.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
1030.

25-43-505. Northwest Technical Institute.

The Northwest Technical Institute shall be a part of the Division of Higher Education.

The Northwest Technical Institute is an educational facility and shall perform those duties as delegated by the Secretary of the Department of Education.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
1030.

Subchapter 6

— Department of Energy and Environment

25-43-601. Department of Energy and Environment.

There is created the Department of Energy and Environment as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2411.

25-43-602. State entities transferred to Department of Energy and Environment.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Energy and Environment by a cabinet-level transfer:

The Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks, created under § 8-7-904;

The Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality, now to be known as the “Division of Environmental Quality”, created under § 25-43-604;

The Arkansas Geological Survey, created under § 15-55-201;

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, created under § 8-4-104;

The Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, created under § 15-75-201;

The Nutrient Water Quality Trading Advisory Panel, created under § 8-4-233; and

The Oil and Gas Commission, created under § 15-71-101.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Energy and Environment under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Energy and Environment under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Energy and Environment under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Energy and Environment in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 1060, § 2, provided: “TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws.”

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department, if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 1060, § 2, provided: “TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws.”

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 95, § 30, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date ofpassage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2411.

25-43-603. Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment.

The executive head of the Department of Energy and Environment shall be the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2411.

25-43-604. Division of Environmental Quality.

There is created the Division of Environmental Quality.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall consist of thedivisions transferred from the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission as of July 1, 1971, and all other divisions, programs, and offices under the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality as of June 30, 2019.

All other departments, divisions, agencies, and commissions within this state shall cooperate with the Division of Environmental Quality in fulfilling the Division of Environmental Quality's responsibilities as defined in this subchapter.

All personnel of the Division of Environmental Quality shall be employed by the Department of Energy and Environment and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment. This subsection does not reduce any right which an employee in the Division of Environmental Quality shall have under any civil service or merit system.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2411.

25-43-605. Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

(1)The executive head of the Division of Environmental Quality shall be the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

The director shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment.

The director, with the advice and consent of the secretary, may organize the Division of Environmental Quality into divisions, offices, or units which may be necessary to effectively and efficiently administer the statutory responsibilities of the Division of Environmental Quality.

The director, with the advice and consent of the secretary, shall appoint the heads of the respective divisions, offices, or units of the Division of Environmental Quality.

Each division, office, or unit of the Division of Environmental Quality shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the director. The director may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions, offices, or units of the Division of Environmental Quality as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the Division of Environmental Quality.

(1)The director shall be the executive officer and active administrator of all pollution control activities.

All of the powers of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under §8-4-201(b)(5) and §§8-4-203 and8-4-204 relating to plans and specifications for disposal systems and permits for the discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes into the waters of the state are vested in the director.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2411.

Subchapter 7

— Department of Finance and Administration

25-43-701. Department of Finance and Administration.

There is created the Department of Finance and Administration as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
3265.

25-43-702. State entities transferred to Department of Finance and Administration.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a cabinet-level transfer:

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, created under § 25-8-101;

The Assessment Coordination Department, created under § 25-28-101, now to be known as the “Assessment Coordination Division”;

The Arkansas Tobacco Control Board, created under § 26-57-255;

Arkansas Tobacco Control, created under § 26-57-257;

The Arkansas Racing Commission, created under § 23-110-201;

The Department of Finance and Administration, created under § 25-8-101;

The Medical Marijuana Commission, created under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, § 19;

The Office of the Arkansas Lottery, created under § 23-115-201;

The Office of Motor Vehicle, created under § 27-14-401;

The Office of Driver Services, created under § 27-16-402; and

The Office of Child Support Enforcement, created under § 9-14-206.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Finance and Administration in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head, of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 96, § 22, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Health.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
3265.

25-43-703. Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

The executive head of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
3265.

Subchapter 8

— Department of Health

25-43-801. Department of Health.

There is created the Department of Health as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-802. State entities transferred to Department of Health.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Health by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Advisory Board for Interpreters between Hearing Individuals and Individuals who are Deaf, Deafblind, Hard of Hearing, or Oral Deaf, created under § 20-14-804;

The Advisory Committee on Healthcare Acquired Infections, created under § 20-9-1204;

The Advisory Council to the Arkansas Youth Suicide Prevention Task Force, created under § 20-77-1607 [repealed];

The Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians, created under § 17-89-201;

The Arkansas Board of Examiners in Counseling, created under § 17-27-201;

The Arkansas Board of Hearing Instrument Dispensers, created under § 17-84-201;

The Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine, created under § 17-96-201;

The Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative, created under § 20-8-505;

The Arkansas Dietetics Licensing Board, created under § 17-83-201;

The Arkansas Minority Health Commission, created under § 20-2-102;

The Arkansas Orthotics, Prosthetics, and Pedorthics Advisory Board, created under § 17-107-201;

The Arkansas Psychology Board, created under § 17-97-201;

The Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board, created under § 17-103-201;

The Arkansas Spinal Cord Commission, created under § 20-8-202;

The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques, created under § 17-102-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Athletic Training, created under § 17-93-404;

The Arkansas State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, created under § 17-81-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners, created under § 17-82-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Nursing, created under § 17-87-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy, created under § 17-92-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Physical Therapy, created under § 17-93-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Sanitarians, created under § 17-43-201;

The Arkansas State Medical Board, created under § 17-95-301;

The Arkansas Suicide Prevention Council, created under § 20-45-302;

The Arkansas Surgeon General, created under § 25-43-806;

The Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission, created under § 19-12-117;

The Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology, created under § 17-100-201;

The Breast Cancer Control Advisory Board, created under § 20-15-1304;

The Cervical Cancer Task Force, created under § 20-9-1102;

The Child Health Advisory Committee, created under § 20-7-133;

The Cosmetology Technical Advisory Committee, created under § 17-26-201;

The Committee of Plumbing Examiners, created under § 17-38-202;

The Drinking Water Advisory and Operator Licensing Committee, created under § 17-51-104;

The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council, created under § 20-13-205;

The Health Services Permit Agency, created under § 20-8-104;

The Health Services Permit Commission, created under § 20-8-102;

The Marine Sanitation Advisory Committee, created under § 27-101-405;

The Massage Therapy Technical Advisory Committee, created under § 17-86-201;

The Medical Ionizing Radiation Licensure Committee, created under § 17-106-104;

The Prescription Drug Monitoring Program Advisory Committee, created under § 20-7-605;

The Prescriptive Authority Advisory Committee, created under § 17-87-205;

The State Board of Examiners of Alcoholism and Drug Abuse Counselors, created under § 17-27-404;

The State Board of Optometry, created under § 17-90-201;

The State Board of Health, created under § 20-7-102;

The State Hospice Office, created under § 20-7-117;

The State Kidney Disease Commission, created under § 20-15-602;

The State Board of Disease Intervention Specialists, created under § 17-98-201;

The Tobacco Prevention and Cessation Program, created under § 19-12-113; and

The Universal Newborn Hearing Screening, Tracking, and Intervention Advisory Board, created under § 20-15-1503.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Health under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Health under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Health under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Health in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary meets all statutory requirements for the position.

Plan, direct, and coordinate all dental public health programs with other local, state, and national health programs;

Serve as the department's chief advisor on matters involving oral health; and

Plan, implement, and evaluate all oral health programs within the department.

The Secretary of the Department of Health may employ the Arkansas Surgeon General.

If employed by the secretary, the Arkansas Surgeon General shall:

The Arkansas Surgeon General shall perform the duties required of him or her by the secretary, including without limitation:

Reviewing legislative analyses and proposed legislation and creating position statements for the Governor and senior state agency officials;

Advising the secretary, senior state agency officials, and governing boards and commissions on policy issues and program accomplishments; and

Providing medical review oversight and guidance to health and human services clinical programs upon the request of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-803. Secretary of the Department of Health.

The executive head of the Department of Health shall be the Secretary of the Department of Health.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-804. Director.

The Secretary of the Department of Health may employ a Director of the Department of Health.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to the director or to other various units or personnel of the Department of Health as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

(1)All other personnel of the department shall be employed by and shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary.

However, this section does not reduce any right that an employee of the department has under any civil service or merit system.

Each unit of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-805. Office of Oral Health.

The Department of Health shall maintain an Office of Oral Health.

(1)The Secretary of the Department of Health may appoint a Director of the Office of Oral Health.

The Director of the Office of Oral Health shall be an experienced public health dentist licensed to practice under the Arkansas Dental Practice Act, §17-82-101 et seq.

The Director of the Office of Oral Health shall:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.